North Carolina, session 2025, HB966.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 116-11 is amended by adding the following new subdivision to
read:
"(3d) The Board of Governors shall adopt a policy on the use of Learning
Management Systems (LMSs) at constituent institutions of The University of
North Carolina. At a minimum, the policy shall prohibit every college, school,
professor, or other entity associated with a constituent institution from
requiring any student, as a part of any course, to sign up for an LMS that
results in a cost to the student above the student fees previously approved by
the Board of Governors."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 academic year.
*H966-v-1*